Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.300

Global citizens in a global society.

By September 1, 2021, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall identify existing state learning standards that address the knowledge and skills that all public school students need to be global citizens in a global society with an appreciation for the contributions of diverse cultures. These state learning standards must be periodically updated to incorporate best practices in ethnic studies.

[ 2020 c 59 s 1; 2019 c 279 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2019 c 279: "The legislature stated in RCW 28A.150.210 that a "basic education is an evolving program of instruction that is intended to provide students with the opportunity to become responsible and respectful global citizens." In order to prepare students to be global citizens, the legislature intends to require the office of the superintendent of public instruction to develop, and periodically update, essential academic learning requirements and grade-level expectations that identify the knowledge and skills that all public school students need to be global citizens in a global society with an appreciation for the contributions of diverse cultures. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must also identify and make available ethnic studies materials and resources for use in grades seven through twelve. The legislature also intends to encourage public schools with students in grades seven through twelve to offer an ethnic studies course that incorporates the materials and resources." [ 2019 c 279 s 1.]

Intent—2019 c 279: See note following RCW 28A.300.112.